New York, session 2025-2026, A7876.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6436 of the education law, as amended by chapter 2 191 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 6436. Bias related and hate crime prevention information. 1. Each 4 college shall inform incoming students about bias related and hate crime 5 prevention measures through programs which may include workshops, semi- 6 nars, discussion groups, and film presentations, in order to disseminate 7 information about bias related and hate crimes, promote discussion, 8 encourage reporting of incidents of bias related and hate crimes, and 9 facilitate prevention of such incidents. Such information shall include, 10 but not be limited to: 11 [1.] (a) the applicable laws, ordinances, and regulations on bias 12 related crime, including the provisions and coverage of the hate crimes 13 act of 2000 codified in article four hundred eighty-five of the penal 14 law; 15 [2.] (b) the penalties for commission of bias related and hate crimes; 16 [3.] (c) the procedures in effect at the college for dealing with bias 17 related and hate crimes; 18 [4.] (d) the availability of counseling and other support services for 19 the victims of bias related and hate crimes; 20 [5.] (e) the nature of and common circumstances relating to bias 21 related and hate crimes on college campuses; and 22 [6.] (f) the methods the college employs to advise and to update 23 students about security procedures. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11206-01-5 A. 7876 2 1 2. Each college shall provide written material, such as flyers, 2 pamphlets, or similar, containing clear information on how and where to 3 report bias related and hate crimes, information on state and federal 4 requirements for reporting bias related and hate crimes, and protections 5 available to those who report bias related and hate crimes. Such materi- 6 als shall be made available and easily accessible to students, faculty, 7 and staff during bias related and hate crime prevention programming 8 required by subdivision one of this section, digitally on the insti- 9 tution's website, and in other locations students may find information, 10 such as libraries, admissions offices, deans' suites, and other 11 locations the college may deem appropriate. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.